Hawaii statutes.
§601-2 Administration. (a) The chief
justice shall be the administrative head of the judiciary. The chief justice
shall make a report to the legislature, at each regular session thereof, of the
business of the judiciary and of the administration of justice throughout the
State. The chief justice shall present to the legislature a unified budget,
six- year program and financial plan, and variance report for all of the
programs of the judiciary. The chief justice shall direct the administration
of the judiciary, with responsibility for the efficient operation of all of the
courts and for the expeditious dispatch of all judicial business.

(b) [Subsection effective until June 30,
2016. For subsection effective July 1, 2016, see below.] The chief justice
shall possess the following powers, subject to such rules as may be adopted by
the supreme court:

(1) To assign circuit judges from one circuit to
another;

(2) In a circuit court with more than one judge, (A)
to make assignments of calendars among the circuit judges for such period as
the chief justice may determine and, as deemed advisable from time to time, to
change assignments of calendars or portions thereof (but not individual cases)
from one judge to another, and (B) to appoint one of the judges, for such
period as the chief justice may determine, as the administrative judge to
manage the business of the court, subject to the rules of the supreme court and
the direction of the chief justice;

(3) To prescribe for all of the courts a uniform
system of keeping and periodically reporting statistics of their business;

(4) To procure from all of the courts estimates for
their appropriations; with the cooperation of the representatives of the court
concerned to review and revise them as the chief justice deems necessary for
equitable provisions for the various courts according to their needs and to
present the estimates, as reviewed and revised by the chief justice, to the
legislature as collectively constituting a unified budget for all of the courts;

(5) To exercise exclusive authority over the
preparation, explanation, and administration of the judiciary budget, programs,
plans, and expenditures, including without limitation policies and practices of
financial administration and the establishment of guidelines as to permissible
expenditures, provided that all expenditures of the judiciary shall be in
conformance with program appropriations and provisions of the legislature, and
all powers of administration over judiciary personnel that are specified in title
7; and

(6) To do all other acts which may be necessary or
appropriate for the administration of the judiciary.

(b) [Subsection effective July 1, 2016.
For subsection effective until June 30, 2016, see above.] The chief
justice shall possess the following powers, subject to rules as may be adopted
by the supreme court:

(1) To assign circuit judges from one circuit to
another;

(2) In a circuit court with more than one judge, (A)
to make assignments of calendars among the circuit judges for a period as the
chief justice may determine and, as deemed advisable from time to time, to
change assignments of calendars or portions thereof (but not individual cases)
from one judge to another, and (B) to appoint one of the judges, for a period
as the chief justice may determine, as the administrative judge to manage the
business of the court, subject to the rules of the supreme court and the
direction of the chief justice;

(3) To prescribe for all of the courts a uniform
system of keeping and periodically reporting statistics of their business;

(4) To procure from all of the courts estimates for
their appropriations; with the cooperation of the representatives of the court
concerned to review and revise them as the chief justice deems necessary for
equitable provisions for the various courts according to their needs and to
present the estimates, as reviewed and revised by the chief justice, to the
legislature as collectively constituting a unified budget for all of the
courts;

(5) To exercise exclusive authority over the
preparation, explanation, and administration of the judiciary budget, programs,
plans, and expenditures, including without limitation policies and practices of
financial administration and the establishment of guidelines as to permissible
expenditures, provided that all expenditures of the judiciary shall be in
conformance with program appropriations and provisions of the legislature, and
all powers of administration over judiciary personnel that are specified in title
7; and

(6) To do all other acts that may be necessary or
appropriate for the administration of the judiciary.

(c) [Subsection effective until June 30,
2016. For subsection effective July 1, 2016, see below.] The budget,
six-year program and financial plan, and the variance report of the judiciary
shall be submitted by the chief justice to the legislature in accordance with
the schedule of submission specified for the governor in chapter 37 and shall
contain the program information prescribed in that chapter. By November 1 of
each year preceding a legislative session in which a budget is to be submitted,
the chief justice shall provide written notification to the governor of the
proposed total expenditures, by cost categories and sources of funding, and
estimated revenues of the judiciary for each fiscal year of the next fiscal
biennium.

(c) [Subsection effective July 1, 2016.
For subsection effective until June 30, 2016, see above.] The budget,
supplemental budget, six-year program and financial plan, and the variance report
of the judiciary shall be submitted by the chief justice to the legislature in
accordance with the schedule of submission specified for the governor in
chapter 37 and shall contain the program information prescribed in that chapter
as applicable to the judiciary. By November 1 of each year preceding a
legislative session in which a budget is to be submitted, the chief justice
shall provide written notification to the governor of the proposed total
expenditures, by cost categories and sources of funding, and estimated revenues
of the judiciary for each fiscal year of the next fiscal biennium or fiscal
year, as applicable. [L 1959, c 259, pt of §1(b); am imp L 1965, c 97, §24;
Supp, §213-1.5; HRS §601-2; am L 1972, c 88, §1(a), (b); am L 1974, c 159, §15;
am L 1977, c 159, §17; gen ch 1985; am L 2015, c 148, §5 and c 160, §9]

Note

Applicability of L 2015, c 148 and c 160 amendments. L 2015,
c 148, §6 and c 160, §11.

Cross References

Generally, see Const. Art. VI, §6.

Annual reports, see §93-12.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next